Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.050

Powers of secretary—Ad hoc advisers—Application of Uniform Disciplinary Act.

(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary may:

(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement this chapter;

(b) Set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(c) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(d) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the education, training, and examination requirements for licensure;

(e) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement this chapter and hire individuals licensed under this chapter to serve as examiners for any practical examinations;

(f) Approve those schools from which graduation will be accepted as proof of an applicant's eligibility to take the licensure examination, specifically requiring that applicants must have completed an accredited respiratory program with at least a two-year curriculum;

(g) Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and supervise the grading and administration of, examinations for applicants for licensure;

(h) Determine whether alternative methods of training are equivalent to formal education and establish forms, procedures, and criteria for evaluation of an applicant's alternative training to determine the applicant's eligibility to take the examination;

(i) Determine which states have legal credentialing requirements equivalent to those of this state and issue licenses to individuals legally credentialed in those states without examination;

(j) Define and approve any experience requirement for licensure;

(k) Appoint members of the profession to serve in an ad hoc advisory capacity to the secretary in carrying out this chapter. The members will serve for designated times and provide advice on matters specifically identified and requested by the secretary. The members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.040 and 43.03.060; and

(l) Define training requirements and hospital protocols for respiratory care therapists to administer nitrous oxide.

(2) The provisions of chapter 18.130 RCW shall govern the issuance and denial of licenses, unlicensed practice, and the disciplining of persons licensed under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 2021 c 114 s 4; 2004 c 262 s 13; 1997 c 334 s 5; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 512; 1991 c 3 s 228; 1987 c 415 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 114: See note following RCW 18.89.010.

Effective date—2004 c 262 ss 13 and 14: "Sections 13 and 14 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [March 31, 2004]." [ 2004 c 262 s 15.]

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.